Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4875.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1321a. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, the legislature shall appropriate not less than $125,000,000.00 each fiscal year for the purpose of transporting pupils as described in section 22l of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1622l.